Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4018
Agent's resignation; notice.

Unless the power of attorney
provides a different method for an agent's resignation, an agent may resign
by giving notice to the principal and, if the principal is incapacitated:

(1) To the conservator
or guardian, if one has been appointed for the principal, and a coagent or
successor agent; or

(2)
If there is no person described in subdivision (1) of this section, to:

(a) The principal's caregiver;

(b) Another person reasonably
believed by the agent to have sufficient interest in the principal's welfare;
or

(c)
A governmental agency having authority to protect the welfare of the principal.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 18.